da: Kedelmateriale i lilletromme: Aluminium; Klokkemessing; Messing; Bronze; Kulstofstål; Kobber; Nysølv; Anden legering; Fosforbronze; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Titanium; Zink; Andet
vi: Vật liệu vỏ trống snare: Nhôm; Đồng chuông; Đồng thau; Đồng thanh; Thép carbon; Đồng đỏ; Bạc niken; Hợp kim khác; Đồng phosphor; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Titan; Kẽm; Khác
bg-BG: Материал на корпуса на соло барабан: Алуминий; Камбанен месинг; Месинг; Бронз; Въглеродна стомана; Мед; Никелово сребро (алпака); Друга сплав; Фосфорен бронз; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Титан; Цинк; Друго
en: Snare drum shell material: Aluminum; Bell brass; Brass; Bronze; Carbon steel; Copper; Nickel silver; Other alloy; Phosphor bronze; Stainless steel; Steel; Titanium; Zinc; Other
cs: Materiál pláště malého bubnu: Hliník; Zvonařská mosaz; Mosaz; Bronz; Uhlíková ocel; Měď; Alpaka; Jiná slitina; Fosforový bronz; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Titan; Zinek; Jiné
pt-PT: Material do corpo do tambor de tarola: Alumínio; Latão de sino; Latão; Bronze; Aço carbono; Cobre; Prata de níquel; Outra liga; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Titânio; Zinco; Outro
sv: Virveltrummas – material för skal: Aluminium; Klockmässing; Mässing; Brons; Kolstål; Koppar; Nysilver; Annan legering; Fosforbrons; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Titan; Zink; Övrigt
pl: Materiał korpusu werbla: Aluminium; Mosiądz dzwonowy; Mosiądz; Brąz; Stal węglowa; Miedź; Nowe srebro; Inny stop; Brąz fosforowy; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Tytan; Cynk; Inny
zh-TW: 小鼓鼓肚材質: 鋁; 鐘銅; 黃銅; 青銅; 碳鋼; 銅; 白銅; 其他合金; 磷青銅; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 鈦; 鋅; 其他
fr: Matériau du fût de la caisse claire: Aluminium; Laiton de cloche; Laiton; Bronze; Acier au carbone; Cuivre; Maillechort; Autre alliage; Bronze phosphoreux; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Titane; Zinc; Autre
el: Υλικό κελύφους ταμπούρου: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος καμπάνας; Ορείχαλκος; Μπρούτζος; Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Χαλκός; Νικελάργυρος/Αλπακάς; Άλλο κράμα; Φωσφορούχος μπρούτζος; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Ψευδάργυρος; Άλλο
nl: Materiaal snaredrumketel: Aluminium; Klokmessing; Messing; Brons; Koolstofstaal; Koper; Nieuwzilver; Andere legering; Fosforbrons; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Titanium; Zink; Anders
nb: Skallmateriale for skarptromme: Aluminium; Klokkemessing; Messing; Bronse; Karbonstål; Kobber; Nysølv; Annen legering; Fosforbronse; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Titan; Sink; Annet
zh-CN: 响弦鼓鼓腔材质: 铝材; 钟响铜; 黄铜; 青铜; 碳钢; 铜; 白铜; 其他合金; 磷青铜; 不锈钢; 钢; 钛; 锌; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal školjke doboša: Aluminij; Zvonovna mjed; Mjed; Bronca; Ugljični čelik; Bakar; Nikal-srebro; Ostale legure; Fosforna bronca; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Titanij; Cink; Ostalo
lt-LT: Mažojo būgno korpuso medžiaga: Aliuminis; Varpų žalvaris; Žalvaris; Bronza; Anglinis plienas; Varis; Naujasidabris; Kitas lydinys; Fosforinė bronza; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Titanas; Cinkas; Kita
sk-SK: Materiál korpusu malého bubna: Hliník; Zvonovina; Mosadz; Bronz; Uhlíková oceľ; Meď; Alpaka; Iná zliatina; Fosforový bronz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Titán; Zinok; Iný
it: Materiale del fusto del rullante: Alluminio; Ottone campana; Ottone; Bronzo; Acciaio al carbonio; Rame; Alpacca; Altra lega; Bronzo fosforoso; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Titanio; Zinco; Altro
de: Material des Snaredrumkessels: Aluminium; Glockenmessing; Messing; Bronze; Kohlenstoffstahl; Kupfer; Neusilber; Andere Legierung; Phosphorbronze; Edelstahl; Stahl; Titan; Zink; Andere
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำตัวกลองสแนร์: อะลูมิเนียม; เบลบราส; ทองเหลือง; บรอนซ์; คาร์บอนสตีล; ทองแดง; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; อัลลอยอื่นๆ; ฟอสเฟอร์บรอนซ์; สเตนเลสสตีล; สตีล; ไทเทเนียม; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
ja: スネアドラムシェル素材: アルミニウム; ベルブラス; ブラス; ブロンズ; カーボンスチール; コッパー; 洋白; その他の合金; フォスファーブロンズ; ステンレススチール; スチール; チタン; 亜鉛; その他
tr: Trampet gövdesi malzemesi: Alüminyum; Çan pirinci; Pirinç; Bronz; Karbon çelik; Bakır; Nikel gümüş; Diğer alaşım; Fosfor bronz; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Titanyum; Çinko; Diğer
sl-SI: Material lesene/kovinske školjke maličnega bobna: Aluminij; Zvonovna medenina; Medenina; Bron; Ogljikovo jeklo; Baker; Nikljevo srebro; Druga zlitina; Fosforjev bron; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Titan; Cink; Drugo
fi: Virvelirummun rungon materiaali: Alumiini; Kellopronssi; Messinki; Pronssi; Hiiliteräs; Kupari; Uushopea; Muu metalliseos; Fosforipronssi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Titaani; Sinkki; Muu
ko: 스네어 드럼 쉘 소재: 알루미늄; 벨 브라스; 황동; 청동; 탄소강; 구리; 양백; 기타 합금; 인청동; 스테인리스 스틸; 스틸; 티타늄; 아연; 기타
ru: Материал корпуса малого барабана: Алюминий; Колокольная латунь; Латунь; Бронза; Углеродистая сталь; Медь; Нейзильбер; Другой сплав; Фосфористая бронза; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Титан; Цинк; Другое
es: Material de la carcasa del redoblante: Aluminio; Latón de campana; Latón; Bronce; Acero al carbono; Cobre; Alpaca; Otra aleación; Bronce fosforado; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Titanio; Zinc; Otro
pt-BR: Caixa, material do casco: Alumínio; Latão de sino; Latão; Bronze; Aço carbono; Cobre; Prata niquelada; Outra liga; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Titânio; Zinco; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de montare a tobei mici: Aluminiu; Alamă de clopote; Alamă; Bronz; Oțel carbon; Cupru; Alpaca; Alt aliaj; Bronz cu fosfor; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Titan; Zinc; Altele
hu: Pergődob külső anyaga: Alumínium; Harangréz; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Szénacél; Réz; Újezüst; Egyéb ötvözet; Foszforbronz; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Titán; Cink; Egyéb